Ohio, session 136, SB400.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3301.96 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3301.96. (A) A program, or group of affiliated programs represented by a statewide organization, seeking designation as a high-quality youth development program shall apply to the director of education and workforce in a manner prescribed by the director. (B) To be eligible for designation as a high-quality youth development program under this section, the program or group of affiliated programs shall demonstrate all of the following to the director: (1) That the program or group is, or supports, either of the following entities: (a) A youth development program as described in division (B)(8) of section 5104.02 of the Revised Code; (b) An approved child day camp or licensed child care program, each as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (2) That the program or group provides adequate safety standards to ensure the care and protection of supported youth, including by complying with federal, state, and local safety laws, performing and documenting safety assessments, and establishing screening protocols for its staff and volunteers; (3) That the program or group exhibits financial soundness and accountability by doing all of the following: (a) Maintaining during the previous fiscal year audited financial statements prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles; (b) Submitting with the application a copy of the results of a financial audit or review conducted within the previous year by a certified public accountant without personal or financial connections to the program or group; (c) Maintaining adequate internal controls over all public funds, including by establishing written policies for procurement, conflict of interest, and segregation of financial duties. (4) That the program or group is able to document its outcomes for youth in this state; (5) That the program or group provides consistent, developmentally appropriate, and structured programming that is administered by qualified staff and aimed at youth outcomes in the areas of academic success, healthy lifestyles, and future readiness; (6) That the program or group demonstrates a history of having operated year-round programming for youth in grades kindergarten to twelve across multiple counties in this state; (7) That the program or group operates in one or more facilities that are both adequate and sufficient to safely and routinely provide intended programming for youth during consistent hours of operation; (8) That the program or group demonstrates proficiency in establishing local partnerships and community and family engagement. (C) The director shall review all applications submitted under division (A) of this section. After receiving an application the director considers complete, the director shall determine if the applicant meets the requirements of division (B) of this section. If the director determines that the requirements have been met, the director shall designate the program or group as a high-quality youth development program. A designation made under this division applies to each facility in which the program or group operates and provides programming for youth.